District of Columbia statutes.
7-2006

Disclaimer of liability.

A person who receives a loan or grant from the fund shall not be considered an agent or instrumentality of the District as a result of the receipt of the loan.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-220, § 7, 36 DCR 550
1981 Ed., § 6-3606.